incubator/apertium-tgk/apertium-tgk.tgk.dix
    <pardef n="ч/ӣ__prn">
      <e>       <p><l>ӣ</l><r>ӣ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>ӣ<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="кадом__prn">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ки__rel">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="ин__det">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дувум__det">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ин</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e> <!-- ~in ?? -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="кадом__det">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳар__det">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Proper Nouns -->

    <pardef n="ИМА__np">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>-</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Тоҷикистон__np">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Африқо__np">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Фурӯғ__np">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Иброҳим__np">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Рустамов__np">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Википедиа__np">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

    <pardef n="хона__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дӯст/ӣ__n">
      <e>       <p><l>ӣ</l><r>ӣ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>ӣ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>иҳо</l><r>ӣ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>иҳо</l><r>ӣ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="китоб__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/узб__n">
      <e>       <p><l>узб</l><r>узб<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>узб</l><r>узб<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>узбҳо</l><r>узб<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>узбҳо</l><r>узб<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>аъзо</l><r>узб<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>аъзо</l><r>узб<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҷ/умҳури__n">
      <e>       <p><l>умҳури</l><r>умҳури<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>умҳуриҳо</l><r>умҳури<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>умҳур</l><r>умҳури<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>амоҳир</l><r>умҳури<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="духтар__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>он</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>он</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="тракторчи__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ён</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ён</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="деҳ__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>от</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>от</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ҳо</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ширкаткунанда__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>гон</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>гон</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="якум__adj">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дигар__adj">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="бузург__adj">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>тар</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>тарин</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>тар</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>тарин</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="хушрӯ/й__adj">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>й</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>тар</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>тарин</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ки"><i>ки</i><par n="ки__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="чӣ"><i>ч</i><par n="ч/ӣ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="кадом"><i>кадом</i><par n="кадом__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳамин"><i>ҳамин</i><par n="ин__det"/></e>
    <e lm="он"><i>он</i><par n="ин__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳамон"><i>ҳамон</i><par n="ин__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳамчунин"><i>ҳамчунин</i><par n="ин__det"/></e>
    <e lm="кадом"><i>кадом</i><par n="кадом__det"/></e>
    <e lm="чанд"><i>чанд</i><par n="кадом__det"/></e>
    <e lm="чӣ"><i>чӣ</i><par n="кадом__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳар"><i>ҳар</i><par n="ҳар__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳеч"><i>ҳеч</i><par n="ҳар__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳама"><i>ҳама</i><par n="ҳар__det"/></e>
    <e lm="чорум"><i>чорум</i><par n="якум__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ёздаҳум"><i>ёздаҳум</i><par n="якум__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳаштодум"><i>ҳаштодум</i><par n="якум__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="мошин"><i>мошин</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="милисахона"><i>милисахона</i><par n="хона__n"/></e>
    <e lm="одина"><i>одина</i><par n="хона__n"/></e>
    <e lm="шлапа"><i>шлапа</i><par n="хона__n"/></e>
    <e lm="баррасӣ"><i>баррас</i><par n="дӯст/ӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="забоншиносӣ"><i>забоншинос</i><par n="дӯст/ӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="маҳаллӣ"><i>маҳалл</i><par n="дӯст/ӣ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="мӯй"><i>мӯй</i><par n="хона__n"/></e>
    <e lm="сурат"><i>сурат</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="дониш"><i>дониш</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷумҳури"><i>ҷ</i><par n="ҷ/умҳури__n"/></e>
    <e lm="узб"><i></i><par n="/узб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="коргар"><i>коргар</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="химик"><i>химик</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="кӯдак"><i>кӯдак</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бинанда"><i>бинанда</i><par n="ширкаткунанда__n"/></e>
    <e lm="музокиракунанда"><i>музокиракунанда</i><par n="ширкаткунанда__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳамлакунанда"><i>ҳамлакунанда</i><par n="ширкаткунанда__n"/></e>
    <e lm="колхозчи"><i>колхозчи</i><par n="тракторчи__n"/></e>
    <e lm="тракторчи"><i>тракторчи</i><par n="тракторчи__n"/></e>
    <e lm="деҳ"><i>деҳ</i><par n="деҳ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="иттисол"><i>иттисол</i><par n="деҳ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="мақом"><i>мақом</i><par n="деҳ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Сан-Марино"><i>Сан-Марино</i><par n="Африқо__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Босния"><i>Босния</i><par n="Африқо__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Бруней"><i>Бруней</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Монако"><i>Монако</i><par n="Африқо__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Никарагуа"><i>Никарагуа</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Амрико"><i>Амрико</i><par n="Африқо__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Гавайӣ"><i>Гавайӣ</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ленинград"><i>Ленинград</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ИМА"><i>ИМА</i><par n="ИМА__np"/></e>
    <e lm="СММ"><i>СММ</i><par n="ИМА__np"/></e>
    <e lm="НАТО"><i>НАТО</i><par n="ИМА__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ЕврАзЭС"><i>ЕврАзЭС</i><par n="ИМА__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Раҳим"><i>Раҳим</i><par n="Иброҳим__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Сергей"><i>Сергей</i><par n="Иброҳим__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Нӯъмонҷон"><i>Нӯъмонҷон</i><par n="Иброҳим__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Мирзо"><i>Мирзо</i><par n="Иброҳим__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Фурӯғ"><i>Фурӯғ</i><par n="Фурӯғ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Нобел"><i>Нобел</i><par n="Рустамов__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Раҳмон"><i>Раҳмон</i><par n="Рустамов__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Абдуллоев"><i>Абдуллоев</i><par n="Рустамов__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Аҳмадинажод"><i>Аҳмадинажод</i><par n="Рустамов__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ҷавонон"><i>Ҷавонон</i><par n="Википедиа__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Миллат"><i>Миллат</i><par n="Википедиа__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ФСБ"><i>ФСБ</i><par n="Википедиа__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Азия-Плюс"><i>Азия-Плюс</i><par n="Википедиа__np"/></e>
    <e lm="баъз"><i>баъз</i><par n="дигар__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бисёр"><i>бисёр</i><par n="дигар__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳеле"><i>ҳеле</i><par n="дигар__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="беш"><i>беш</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бузург"><i>бузург</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="озод"><i>озод</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="хушрӯй"><i>хушрӯ</i><par n="хушрӯ/й__adj"/></e>
